src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-1E-pieaqss_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pieʹss: # Noun e-stem 'nest' - full paradigm
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Nom: piẹʹss
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Gen: piẹʹzz
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Acc: piẹʹzz
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Ill: peäsˈsa
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Loc: piẹʹzzest
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Com: pieʹzzin
     pieʹss+N+Ess: piẹʹssen
     pieʹss+N+Par: piẹʹssed
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Abe: [piẹʹzztaa, piẹʹzztää]
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Nom: piẹʹzz
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Gen: pieʹzzi
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Acc: pieʹzzid
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Ill: pieʹzzid
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Loc: pieʹzzin
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Com: pieʹzzivuiʹm
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Abe: [pieʹzzitaa, pieʹzzitää]
     pieʹss+N+Der/teʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom: piẹʹzzteʹm
     pieʹss+N+Der/teʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom: piẹʹzzteeʹm
     pieʹss+N+Der/teʹm+A+Attr: piẹʹzzteʹmes
     pieʹss+N+Der/t+A+Comp: piẹʹzztab
     pieʹss+N+Der/t+A+Der/umus+Superl: piẹʹzztumus

##
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: peässam
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: peässad
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: piẹʹsses
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: piẹʹssem
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: piẹʹssed
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: piẹʹssez
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: peässan
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: peäzzad
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: piẹʹzzes
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: piẹʹssen
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: piẹʹzzed
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: piẹʹzzez
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: peässan
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: peäzzad
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: piẹʹzzes
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: piẹʹssen
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: piẹʹzzed
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: piẹʹzzez
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: peäsˈsʼsan
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: peäsˈsʼsad
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: peäsˈsʼses
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: peäsˈsʼseen
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: peäsˈsʼseed
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: peäsˈsʼseez
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: piẹˈʹzstan
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: piẹˈʹzstad
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: piẹˈʹzstes
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: piẹˈʹzsteen
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: piẹˈʹzsteed
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: piẹˈʹzsteez
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: pieʹzzinan
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: pieʹzzinad
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: pieʹzzines
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: pieʹzzineen
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: pieʹzzineed
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: pieʹzzineez
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: peässantää
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: peäzzadtää
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: piẹʹzzestää
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: piẹʹssentää
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: piẹʹzzedtää
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: piẹʹzzeztää
     pieʹss+N+Ess+PxSg1: peäʹsˈsnan
     pieʹss+N+Ess+PxSg2: peäʹsˈsnad
     pieʹss+N+Ess+PxSg3: peäʹsˈsnes
     pieʹss+N+Ess+PxPl1: peäʹsˈsneen
     pieʹss+N+Ess+PxPl2: peäʹsˈsneed
     pieʹss+N+Ess+PxPl3: peäʹsˈsneez
#
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: peässan
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: peäzzad
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: piẹʹzzes
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: piẹʹssen
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: piẹʹzzed
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: piẹʹzzez
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: pieʹzzään
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: pieʹzzääd
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: pieʹzzees
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: pieʹzzeen
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: pieʹzzeed
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: pieʹzzeez
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: pieʹzzään
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: pieʹzzääd
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: pieʹzzees
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: pieʹzzeen
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: pieʹzzeed
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: pieʹzzeez
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: pieʹzzään
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: pieʹzzääd
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: pieʹzzees
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: pieʹzzeen
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: pieʹzzeed
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: pieʹzzeez
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: pieʹzzinan
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: pieʹzzinad
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: pieʹzzines
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: pieʹzzineen
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: pieʹzzineed
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: pieʹzzineez
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: pieʹzzäänvuiʹm
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: pieʹzzäädvuiʹm
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: pieʹzzeesvuiʹm
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: pieʹzzeenvuiʹm
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: pieʹzzeedvuiʹm
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: pieʹzzeezvuiʹm
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: pieʹzzääntää
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: pieʹzzäädtää
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: pieʹzzeestää
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: pieʹzzeentää
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: pieʹzzeedtää
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: pieʹzzeeztää
#
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: peäzzaž
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: peäzza
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: peäzza
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: peäzzʼže
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: peäzzast
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: peäzzain
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe: [peäzzataa, peäzzatää]
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess: peäzzʼžen
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Par: peäzzʼžed
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: peäzza
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen: peäzzai
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc: peäzzaid
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill: peäzzaid
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc: peäzzain
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com: peäzzaivuiʹm
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe: [peäzzaitaa, peäzzaitää]
# according to Pekka 1991: 163--164
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: peäzzʼžam
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: peäzzʼžad
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: peäzzʼžes
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: peäzzʼžeem
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: peäzzʼžeed
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: peäzzʼžeez
     
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: peäzzʼžan
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: peäzzʼžad
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: peäzzʼžes
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: peäzzʼžeen
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: peäzzʼžeed
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: peäzzʼžeez
     
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: peäzzʼžan
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: peäzzʼžad
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: peäzzʼžes
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: peäzzʼžeen
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: peäzzʼžeed
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: peäzzʼžeez

     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: peäzzʼžasan
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: peäzzʼžasad
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: peäzzʼžasas
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: peäzzʼžeʹsen
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: peäzzʼžeʹsed
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: peäzzʼžeʹsez
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: peäˈzstan
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: peäˈzstad
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: peäˈzstes
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: peäˈzsteen
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: peäˈzsteed
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: peäˈzsteez
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: peäzzainan
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: peäzzainad
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: peäzzaines
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: peäzzaineen
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: peäzzaineed
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: peäzzaineez
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: peäzzʼžantää
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: peäzzʼžadtää
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: peäzzʼžestää
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: peäzzʼžeentää
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: peäzzʼžeedtää
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: peäzzʼžeeztää

#     
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: peäzzʼžan
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: peäzzʼžad
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: peäzzʼžes
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: peäzzʼžeen
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: peäzzʼžeed
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: peäzzʼžeez
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: peäzzään
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: peäzzääd
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: peäzzees
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: peäzzeen
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: peäzzeed
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: peäzzeez
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: peäzzään
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: peäzzääd
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: peäzzees
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: peäzzeen
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: peäzzeed
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: peäzzeez
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: peäzzään
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: peäzzääd
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: peäzzees
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: peäzzeen
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: peäzzeed
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: peäzzeez
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: peäzzainan
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: peäzzainad
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: peäzzaines
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: peäzzaineen
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: peäzzaineed
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: peäzzaineez
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: peäzzäänvuiʹm
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: peäzzäädvuiʹm
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: peäzzeesvuiʹm
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: peäzzeenvuiʹm
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: peäzzeedvuiʹm
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: peäzzeezvuiʹm
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: peäzzääntää
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: peäzzäädtää
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: peäzzeestää
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: peäzzeentää
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: peäzzeedtää
     pieʹss+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: peäzzeeztää
